District of Columbia statutes.
34-1262.03

Employment of District residents.

Except as otherwise provided in a cable franchise agreement, a cable operator’s employee workforce and subcontractors shall consist of not less than 51% District residents.

Aug. 21, 1982, D.C. Law 4-142, § 1203
as added Oct. 9, 2002, D.C. Law 14-193, § 2(b), 49 DCR 7334